District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.32

Penalties; conduct of prosecutions.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500, or by both such fine and imprisonment not to exceed 6 months. All prosecutions under this subchapter shall be instituted by the Corporation Counsel or one of his assistants in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1225, ch. 118, § 32
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 463, 32 DCR 4450

History

1981 Ed., § 10-136.
1973 Ed., § 10-134.

Prior Codifications